Ohio, session 136, HB922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3902.65 and 5164.081 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3902.65. (A) Notwithstanding section 3901.71 of the Revised Code, a health benefit plan shall provide coverage for colorectal cancer screening tests for a covered individual twenty-one years of age or older to the same extent that those screening tests are covered in accordance with section 2713 of the "Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010," 42 U.S.C. 300-gg-13(a)(1), for a covered individual forty-five years of age or older. (B) A health benefit plan shall not impose a cost-sharing requirement for coverage required under division (A) of this section that exceeds the cost-sharing requirements that apply to colorectal cancer screening tests for a covered individual forty-five years of age or older. Sec. 5164.081. The medicaid program shall cover colorectal cancer screening tests for an individual twenty-one years of age or older to the same extent that those screening tests would be covered in accordance with section 2713 of the "Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010," 42 U.S.C. 300-gg-13(a)(1), for an individual forty-five years of age or older. Section 2. The enactment of section 3902.65 of the Revised Code by this act applies to health benefit plans, as defined in section 3922.01 of the Revised Code, that are delivered, issued for delivery, modified, or renewed on or after the effective date of that section.